Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.210

Procedure on appeal—Notice of appeal.

The notice of appeal must be filed within ten days after the ordinance confirming the assessment roll becomes effective and shall describe the property and set forth the objections of the appellant to the assessment.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.44.210. Prior: 1957 c 143 s 3; prior: 1911 c 98 s 22, part; RRS s 9374, part.]